California, session 20252026, SB1312.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7604 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:7604. The bureau may establish an advisory committee to assist the bureau in engaging consumers and licensees in its regulatory activities. If the bureau establishes an advisory committee, the advisory committee shall include at least one member from each of the following groups:(a) Licensed representatives of the death care industry.(b) Members of the public.(c) Representatives of local governments.SEC. 2. Section 7612.6 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7612.6. (a) Each cemetery authority shall file with the bureau annually, every three or five years, on or before June 1, or within five months after close of their third or fifth fiscal year provided approval has been granted by the bureau as provided for in Section 7612.7, a written report in a form prescribed by the bureau setting forth the following:(1) The number of square feet of grave space and the number of crypts and niches sold or disposed of under endowment care by specific periods as set forth in the form prescribed.(2) The amount collected and deposited in both the general and special endowment care funds segregated as to the amounts for crypts, niches, and grave space by specific periods as set forth either on the accrual or cash basis at the option of the cemetery authority.(3) A statement showing separately the total amount of the general and special endowment care funds invested in each of the investments authorized by law and the amount of cash on hand not invested, which statement shall actually show the financial condition of the funds.(4) A statement showing separately the location, description, and character of the investments in which the special endowment care funds are invested. The statement shall show the valuations of any securities held in the endowment care fund as valued pursuant to Section 7614.7.(5) A statement showing the transactions entered into between the corporation or any officer, employee, or stockholder thereof and the trustees of the endowment care funds with respect to those endowment care funds. The statement shall show the dates, amounts of the transactions, and shall contain a statement of the reasons for those transactions.(b) The report shall be verified by the president or vice president and one other officer of the cemetery corporation. The information submitted pursuant to paragraphs (2), (3), (4), and (5) of subdivision (a) shall be accompanied by an annual audit report, report for each year within the reporting period described in subdivision (a) prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, of the endowment care fund and special care fund signed by a certified public accountant or public accountant. The scope of the audit shall include the inspection, review, and audit of the general purpose financial statements of the endowment care fund and special care fund, which shall include the balance sheet, the statement of revenues, expenditures, and changes in fund balance.(c) If a cemetery authority files a written request prior to the date the report is due, the bureau may, in its discretion, grant an extension for no more than an additional nine months within which to file the report.SEC. 3. Section 7612.7 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7612.7. Each cemetery authority requesting a change of filing date of the endowment care fund report from a calendar year to a fiscal year or a change in fiscal year shall file a petition with the bureau prior to the close of the year of request. The bureau may approve such petition provided that no report shall be for a period of more than 12 months.SEC. 4. Section 7653.10 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:7653.10. (a) In addition to any other remedies provided by law, upon a finding by a court of competent jurisdiction that a certificate of authority of a cemetery for which a certificate of authority is required has lapsed or has been suspended, surrendered, abandoned, or revoked, the court shall do all of the following with respect to the cemetery:(1) Name the bureau conservator to conserve the endowment care fund and special care fund.(2) Take actions as it deems appropriate pursuant to Sections 7613.11, 7653.1, and 7653.9.(3) Authorize interments for decedents who have a right of interment through a preneed contract.(4) Take actions as it deems appropriate to ensure the continued care, maintenance, and embellishment of the property.(5) Pursue the transfer of the entirety or portions of the property ownership to one or more nonprofit, business, or governmental entities.(b) The bureau may establish abbreviated requirements for the operation and maintenance of the property or portions of the property as it deems appropriate for its planned use and in recognition of the limited financial viability of the property.(c) The new owner to which the property is transferred and any individual serving as a temporary manager shall not be liable for the debts, obligations, taxes, fines, or judgments of the previous owner.(d) For purposes of this section, a certificate of authority is abandoned if the court determines that for an extended and unreasonable period of time one or more of the following has occurred and that the health, safety, comfort, or welfare of the public is threatened or endangered:(1) Unresponsiveness to the public.(2) Inability of the community to access and visit the property.(3) Failure to perform authorized interments.(4) Nonpayment of property taxes.(5) Serious violation of the maintenance standards.(6) A city or county declaration of abandonment as provided in Section 8825 of the Health and Safety Code. (7) Unavailability of special care or endowment care funds for the purposes set forth in this chapter.SEC. 5. The heading of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8825) of Part 3 of Division 8 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read: CHAPTER 7. Abandonment of a nonendowment care cemeterySEC. 6. Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 8830) is added to Part 3 of Division 8 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 7.5. Abandonment of an Endowment Care Cemetery8830. For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(a) “Abandoned endowment care cemetery” means a cemetery that was formerly licensed under Chapter 12 (commencing with section 7600) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, maintained an endowment care fund, and is declared abandoned pursuant to Section 8831.(b) “Bureau” means the Cemetery and Funeral Bureau.(c) “Endowment care fund” means an endowment care fund described in Section 8725.8831. A city, county, or city and county may, by resolution of its governing board, formally declare the abandonment of a cemetery for purposes of this chapter if the circumstances in subdivision (a) apply and the owner of the cemetery property is provided written notice pursuant to subdivision (b), as follows:(a) (1) The city, county, or city and county may declare a cemetery abandoned pursuant to this section if all of the following circumstances have occurred:(A) The certificate of authority of the cemetery has been canceled, surrendered, abandoned, or revoked for at least one year.(B) The bureau has conserved the endowment care fund.(C) In addition to subparagraphs (A) and (B), at least one of the following circumstances are met:(i) The bureau has imposed citations or disciplinary actions for maintenance deficiencies or mismanagement of the endowment care fund of the cemetery.(ii) Local authorities have imposed citations or notices.(iii) Nonpayment of property taxes have resulted in a lien on the cemetery property.(iv) Local authorities have performed maintenance on the cemetery property to protect public health, safety, or welfare.(v) There has been limited access or no access to the cemetery property for families and visitors.(vi) The owner of the cemetery property has voluntarily abandoned the property. Notwithstanding any other requirement of this section, a finding of this circumstance alone shall be sufficient to declare a cemetery abandoned pursuant to this section.(2) Any of the following circumstances may have occurred:(A) The cemetery has not made any sales for at least one year.(B) There has not been any interments for at least one year.(C) There is little to no remaining inventory or cemetery plots.(b) (1) Written notice shall be provided to the owner of the cemetery property 90 days prior to, and upon, declaration of abandonment.(2) Written notice to the owner of the cemetery property shall, at a minimum, identify the record owner or possessor of property, set forth the last known address of the record owner or possessor, set forth the date that the city, county, or city and county began the process to declare abandonment, and include a description of the real property subject to abandonment.8832. If the cemetery has been declared abandoned pursuant to Section 8830 for more than one year, the title of the abandoned endowment care cemetery shall transfer to the city, county, or city and county that declared the cemetery abandoned and shall be recorded with the county.(a) The city, county, or city and county shall keep a record of and honor all prior and outstanding contracts for burial entered into by the prior cemetery authority.(b) The city, county, or city and county shall not be liable for any of the following:(1)  Except as provided in subdivision (a), any debts, obligations, taxes, fines, or judgments of the previous owner.(2) Harm, loss, or damages for any actions performed by the prior owner of the cemetery property for a period of three years while the property is returned to a safe condition.(3) Failure to provide any missing paperwork or contracts.(c) The city, county, or city and county shall not be required to return the property to the prior owner of the cemetery property.8833. The city, county, or city and county may transfer the care and management of an abandoned endowment care cemetery to an entity described in Section 7612.2 of the Business and Professions Code to be responsible for the care, maintenance, and embellishment the cemetery and working with licensees under the Cemetery and Funeral Act (Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code) to perform burials for any graves in the cemetery previously sold.(a) The entity shall keep a record of and honor all prior and outstanding contracts for burial entered into by the prior cemetery authority.(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), the entity shall not be liable for any debts, obligations, taxes, fines, or judgments of the previous owner.8834. (a) The city, county, or city and county may transfer the care and management of an abandoned endowment care cemetery to a cemetery owner licensed under the Cemetery and Funeral Act (Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code).(b) The cemetery owner shall have a period of five years to become compliant with the minimum maintenance standards described in the Cemetery and Funeral Act (Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code).8835. (a) The endowment care fund of an abandoned endowment care cemetery may be disbursed to the person or entity caring for and managing the cemetery, as described in this chapter, to conserve and protect the fund.(b) If a licensee under the Cemetery and Funeral Act (Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code) or an entity described in Section 7612.2 of the Business and Professions Code does not assume ownership of an abandoned endowment care cemetery, the city, county, or city and county shall have authority over the endowment care fund and shall be responsible for ongoing care, maintenance, and embellishment of the cemetery and performance of any prepaid burial obligations.8836. The person or entity caring for and managing an abandoned endowment care cemetery may initiate a petition to form a public cemetery district or join an existing public cemetery district pursuant to the Public Cemetery District Law (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 4 of Division 8 of the Health and Safety Code).